Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB863.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 17 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a uniform citation report created in response
to a motor vehicle accident where law enforcement suspects that the use of drugs or
alcohol contributed to the accident shall not be made public until the law enforcement
agency receives the results of any test for drugs or alcohol.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 3/3/2026 12:46 PM Jacketed